North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 3. Presumptions in Civil Actions and Proceedings.

Rule 301.
Presumptions in general in civil actions and proceedings.

In all civil actions and proceedings when not otherwise provided for by statute, by judicial decision, or by these rules, a presumption imposes on the party against whom it is directed the burden of going forward with evidence to rebut or meet the presumption, but does not shift to such party the burden of proof in the sense of the risk of nonpersuasion, which remains throughout the trial upon the party on whom it was originally cast. The burden of going forward is satisfied by the introduction of evidence sufficient to permit reasonable minds to conclude that the presumed fact does not exist. If the party against whom a presumption operates fails to meet the burden of producing evidence, the presumed fact shall be deemed proved, and the court shall instruct the jury accordingly. When the burden of producing evidence to meet a presumption is satisfied, the court must instruct the jury that it may, but is not required to, infer the existence of the presumed fact from the proved fact.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

The first sentence of this rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 301, except that the phrase “by statute, by judicial decision” is used in lieu of the phrase “by Act of Congress.” The last three sentences of the rule, which were modeled upon Alaska Rule of Evidence 301 (1979), clarify the effect of the rule.

A presumption is an assumption of fact resulting from a rule of law which requires such fact to be assumed or inferred from another fact established in the action. The term “basic fact” is used to designate the fact from which the assumption or inference is made and the term “presumed fact” is used to indicate the fact assumed or inferred.

The rule does not apply to “conclusive presumptions”, which are merely statements of substantive law and have nothing to do with the law of evidence. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 215, at 170 (1982).

In some situations, when the basic fact has been established, the presumed fact may (but need not) be found to exist. The existence of the presumed fact is for the trier of fact to determine from all the evidence
pro
and

con.

The term “permissive presumption” is used to describe this situation.

Id.

at 171. Or it is said that the basic fact is

prima facie

evidence of the fact to be inferred. Rule 301 does not apply in situations where a statute or judicial decision creates a “permissive presumption” or merely provides that one fact shall be

“prima facie”

evidence of another.

The term “mandatory presumption” is used when the presumed fact
must
be found when the basic fact has been established, unless sufficient evidence of the nonexistence of the presumed fact is forthcoming.

Id.

at 171. Rule 301 is intended to govern mandatory presumptions.

Care should be taken to determine whether the presumption in question is within the scope of this rule since the term presumption is often misused. The first sentence of the rule makes it clear that the General Assembly and the courts retain power to create presumptions having an effect different from that provided for in this rule. Nonetheless, a presumption created by a prior statute or judicial decision should be construed to come within the scope of this rule unless it is clear that the presumption was not intended to be a “mandatory presumption”.

Under Rule 301, the presumption satisfies the burden of producing evidence of the presumed fact. Evidence sufficient to prove the basic fact is sufficient proof of the presumed fact to survive a directed verdict at the end of the proponent’s case-in-chief. This is in accord with North Carolina practice.

The general rule in North Carolina is in accord with Rule 301 in that a presumption does not shift the burden of proof.
Id.
§ 218, at 179. However, with respect to some presumptions in North Carolina, the opponent has the burden of persuading the jury, by a preponderance of the evidence or otherwise, that the presumed fact does not exist.

Id.

If by statute or judicial decision a particular presumption shifts the burden of proof, Rule 301 does not apply.

Proof of the basic fact not only discharges the proponent’s burden of producing evidence of the presumed fact but also places upon the opponent the burden of producing evidence that the presumed fact does not exist. If the opponent does not introduce any evidence, or the evidence is not sufficient to permit reasonable minds to conclude that the presumed fact does not exist, the proponent is entitled to a peremptory instruction that the presumed fact shall be deemed proved. This is in accord with North Carolina practice.
Id.
§ 222, at 189.

If the opponent introduces evidence sufficient to permit reasonable minds to conclude that the presumed fact does not exist, no peremptory instruction should be given. Rather, the court must instruct the jury that it may, but is not required to, infer the existence of the presumed fact from proof of the basic fact.

Of course, the opponent may avoid the effect of a presumption by proving that the basic fact does not exist.

Rule 302.
Applicability of federal law in civil actions and proceedings.

In civil actions and proceedings, the effect of a presumption respecting a fact which is an element of a claim or defense as to which federal law supplies the rule of decision is determined in accordance with federal law.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule differs from Fed. R. Evid. 302 in that “federal law” has been substituted for “state law.” The Comment to Rule 302 of the Uniform Rules of Evidence (1974) explains the purpose of the change:

“Parallel jurisdiction in state and federal courts exists in many instances. The rule prescribes that when a federally created right is litigated in a state court, any prescribed federal presumption shall be applied.”